Maryland, session 2025, HB1248.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–321.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1248*

HOUSE BILL 1248
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “COVERED PLATFORM” MEANS A PUBLIC–FACING WEBSITE
OR DIGITAL APPLICATION THAT:
1. PRIMARILY PROVIDES A FORUM FOR USERS OF THE
PLATFORM TO ACCESS USER–GENERATED CONTENT, INCLUDING MESSAGES,
VIDEOS, IMAGES, GAMES, AND AUDIO FILES; AND
2. HAS AT LEAST 100,000 UNIQUE MONTHLY ACTIVE
USERS IN THE UNITED STATES.
(II) “COVERED PLATFORM” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
1. A PROVIDER OF BROADBAND INTERNET ACCESS
SERVICE;
2. A PROVIDER OF ELECTRONIC MAIL; OR
3. A PUBLIC–FACING WEBSITE OR DIGITAL
APPLICATION THAT CONSISTS PRIMARILY OF CONTENT THAT IS NOT USER
GENERATED.
(3) “INTIMATE PARTS” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3–809 OF THE
CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE.
(4) “INTIMATE VISUAL DEPICTION” MEANS A VISUAL
REPRESENTATION OF AN IDENTIFIABLE PERSON, OR A COMPUTER–GENERATED
VISUAL REPRESENTATION THAT APPEARS TO BE OF AN ACTUAL AND IDENTIFIABLE
PERSON, THAT DISPLAYS THE PERSON WITH INTIMATE PARTS EXPOSED OR WHILE
ENGAGED IN SEXUAL ACTIVITY.
(5) “SEXUAL ACTIVITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3–809 OF THE
CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE.
(B) (1) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2026, A COVERED PLATFORM SHALL
ESTABLISH AND MAINTAIN A PROCESS FOR AN INDIVIDUAL, OR AN INDIVIDUAL’S
REPRESENTATIVE, TO:

HOUSE BILL 1248 3
(I) NOTIFY THE COVERED PLATFORM THAT THE COVERED
PLATFORM IS ALLOWING ACCESS TO OR OTHERWISE DISPLAYING AN INTIMATE
VISUAL DEPICTION OF THE INDIVIDUAL WITHOUT THE INDIVIDUAL’S CONSENT; AND
(II) SUBMIT A REQUEST THAT THE COVERED PLATFORM:
1. DISABLE ACCESS TO OR REMOVE THE INTIMATE
VISUAL DEPICTION;
2. IDENTIFY AND DISABLE ACCESS TO OR REMOVE ANY
COPIES OF THE INTIMATE VISUAL DEPICTION; AND
3. PREVENT NEW COPIES OF THE INTIMATE VISUAL
DEPICTION FROM BEING ACCESSED OR DISPLAYED BY THE COVERED PLATFORM.
(2) A NOTIFICATION AND REQUEST FOR REMOVAL OF AN INTIMATE
VISUAL DEPICTION SUBMITTED USING THE PROCESS ESTABLISHED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE, IN WRITING:
(I) A PHYSICAL OR ELECTRONIC SIGNATURE OF THE
INDIVIDUAL OR THE INDIVIDUAL’S REPRESENTATIVE;
(II) AN IDENTIFICATION OF THE INTIMATE VISUAL DEPICTION
OF THE INDIVIDUAL;
(III) A BRIEF STATEMENT THAT THE INDIVIDUAL HAS A GOOD
FAITH BELIEF THAT THE INTIMATE VISUAL DEPICTION HAS BEEN MADE AVAILABLE
FOR ACCESS OR OTHERWISE DISPLAYED WITHOUT THE INDIVIDUAL’S CONSENT; AND
(IV) ANY RELEVANT INFORMATION TO ASSIST THE COVERED
PLATFORM TO DETERMINE WHETHER THE INTIMATE VISUAL DEPICTION HAS BEEN
MADE AVAILABLE FOR ACCESS OR OTHERWISE DISPLAYED WITHOUT THE
INDIVIDUAL’S CONSENT.
(C) A COVERED PLATFORM SHALL PROVIDE A CLEAR AND CONSPICUOUS
NOTICE OF THE PROCESS ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION
THAT IS ACCESSIBLE BY THE PUBLIC THROUGH THE INTERNET.
(D) ON RECEIPT OF A REQUEST MADE USING THE PROCESS ESTABLISHED
UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A COVERED PLATFORM SHALL COMPLY
WITH THE REQUEST AS SOON AS POSSIBLE, BUT NOT LATER THAN 48 HOURS AFTER
RECEIVING THE REQUEST.

HOUSE BILL 1248
(E) A COVERED PLATFORM SHALL ESTABLISH MINIMUM DATA LOGGING
REQUIREMENTS THAT:
(1) PRESERVE DATA NECESSARY FOR LEGAL PROCEEDINGS RELATED
TO AN INTIMATE PRIVACY VIOLATION; AND
(2) ENSURE THAT DATA PRESERVED UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION IS NOT TRANSFERRED OR OTHERWISE USED FOR A PURPOSE OTHER
THAN A LEGAL PROCEEDING RELATED TO AN INTIMATE PRIVACY VIOLATION.
(F) A COVERED PLATFORM MAY NOT BE HELD LIABLE FOR A CLAIM ARISING
IN TORT OR CONTRACT BASED ON THE COVERED PLATFORM’S DISABLING OF ACCESS
TO OR REMOVING OF AN INTIMATE VISUAL DEPICTION IN COMPLIANCE WITH, OR A
GOOD FAITH ATTEMPT TO COMPLY WITH, THIS SECTION.
Article – Criminal Law
3–809.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) (I) “APPEARS TO BE OF AN ACTUAL AND IDENTIFIABLE
PERSON” MEANS THAT AN ORDINARY PERSON WOULD CONCLUDE THAT THE VISUAL
REPRESENTATION IS OF AN ACTUAL AND IDENTIFIABLE PERSON.
(II) “APPEARS TO BE OF AN ACTUAL AND IDENTIFIABLE
PERSON” INCLUDES A COMPUTER–GENERATED VISUAL REPRESENTATION THAT HAS
BEEN CREATED, ADAPTED, OR MODIFIED TO APPEAR AS AN ACTUAL AND
IDENTIFIABLE PERSON.
(III) “APPEARS TO BE OF AN ACTUAL AND IDENTIFIABLE
PERSON” DOES NOT INCLUDE VISUAL REPRESENTATIONS OR ITEMS DEPICTING A
PERSON THAT ARE:
1. DRAWINGS;
2. CARTOONS;
3. SCULPTURES; OR
4. PAINTINGS.

HOUSE BILL 1248 5
(3) “Distribute” means to give, sell, transfer, disseminate, publish, upload,
circulate, broadcast, make available, allow access to, or engage in any other form of
transmission, electronic or otherwise.
[(3)] (4) “Harm” means:
(i) physical injury;
(ii) serious emotional distress; or
(iii) economic damages.
[(4)] (5) “Intimate parts” means the naked genitals, pubic area, buttocks,
or female nipple.
[(5)] (6) “Sexual activity” means:
(i) sexual intercourse, including genital–genital, oral–genital,
anal–genital, or oral–anal;
(ii) masturbation; or
(iii) sadomasochistic abuse.
(7) “VISUAL REPRESENTATION OF ANOTHER IDENTIFIABLE PERSON”
INCLUDES A COMPUTER–GENERATED VISUAL REPRESENTATION THAT APPEARS TO
BE OF AN ACTUAL AND IDENTIFIABLE PERSON.
(b) (1) This section does not apply to:
(i) lawful and common practices of law enforcement, the reporting
of unlawful conduct, or legal proceedings; or
(ii) situations involving voluntary exposure in public or commercial
settings.
(2) An interactive computer service, as defined in 47 U.S.C. § 230(f)(2), is
not liable under this section for content provided by another person.
(c) A person may not knowingly distribute a visual representation of another
identifiable person that displays the other person with [his or her] intimate parts exposed
or while engaged in an act of sexual activity:
(1) with the intent to harm, harass, intimidate, threaten, or coerce the
other person;

HOUSE BILL 1248
(2) (i) under circumstances in which the person knew that the other
person did not consent to the distribution; or
(ii) with reckless disregard as to whether the person consented to the
distribution; and
(3) IF THE VISUAL REPRESENTATION WAS CREATED OR GENERATED
WITH PERMISSION FROM THE OTHER PERSON, under circumstances in which the
[other] person KNEW OR REASONABLY SHOULD HAVE KNOWN THAT THE OTHER
PERSON had a reasonable expectation that the image would remain private.
(d) A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction
is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 2 years or a fine not exceeding $5,000 or both.
(e) A person who violates this section is subject to § 5–106(b) of the Courts Article.
(f) A visual representation, INCLUDING A COMPUTER–GENERATED VISUAL
REPRESENTATION, of a victim that is part of a court record for a case arising from a
prosecution under this section:
(1) subject to item (2) of this subsection, may not be made available for
public inspection; and
(2) except as otherwise ordered by the court, may only be made available
for inspection in relation to a criminal charge under this section to:
(i) court personnel;
(ii) a jury in a criminal case brought under this section;
(iii) the State’s Attorney or the State’s Attorney’s designee;
(iv) the Attorney General or the Attorney General’s designee;
(v) a law enforcement officer;
(vi) the defendant or the defendant’s attorney; or
(vii) the victim or the victim’s attorney.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.